Maine, session 132, LD1026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3204, sub-§2, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. DD, §2, is
amended to read:
E. Administer contracts with regional councils and regional planning and development
districts to provide technical assistance and resources to municipalities and tribal
governments on issues related to planning, climate resilience and development,
including but not limited to land use planning, planning for housing and other
residential development, climate resilience planning and related infrastructure
planning, building codes and other forms of local development assistance to support
state, regional and local goals; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §3204, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. DD, §2, is
amended to read:
F. Consult with and provide ongoing coordination with state agencies on programs
and issues related to planning technical assistance and funding to communities in this
State, including but not limited to the Department of Transportation; Department of
Environmental Protection; Department of Marine Resources; Department of Inland
Fisheries and Wildlife; Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry;
Department of Economic and Community Development; Department of Health and
Human Services; Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Maine Emergency Management Agency; Department of Public Safety; Maine State
Housing Authority; Governor's Energy Office; Efficiency Maine Trust; the Maine
Historic Preservation Commission; and the Maine Redevelopment Land Bank
Authority.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §3204, sub-§2, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Create and provide to municipalities, tribal governments and regional councils a
mapping template and technical assistance to allow a municipality, tribal government
or regional council to proactively map out areas of concern related to aquaculture lease
siting.